Nevada, session 83, AB382.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 689A.0446 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0446 1. Subject to the limitations prescribed by
subsection 4, an insurer that issues a policy of health insurance shall
include in the policy coverage for [medically necessary] biomarker
testing for the diagnosis, treatment, appropriate management and
ongoing monitoring of [cancer] a medical condition or disease
when such biomarker testing is supported by medical and scientific
evidence. Such evidence includes, without limitation:
(a) The labeled indications for a biomarker test or medication
that has been approved or cleared by the United States Food and
Drug Administration;
(b) The indicated tests for a drug that has been approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration or the warnings and
precautions included on the label of such a drug;
(c) A national coverage determination or local coverage
determination, as those terms are defined in 42 C.F.R. § 400.202; or
(d) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines or
consensus statements.
2. An insurer shall:
(a) Provide the coverage required by subsection 1 in a manner
that limits disruptions in care and the need for multiple specimens;
(b) Establish a clear and readily accessible process for an
insured or provider of health care to:
(1) Request an exception to a policy excluding coverage for
biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment, management or
ongoing monitoring of [cancer;] a medical condition or disease; or
(2) Appeal a denial of coverage for such biomarker testing;
and
(c) Make the process described in paragraph (b) available on an
Internet website maintained by the insurer.
3. If an insurer requires an insured to obtain prior authorization
for a biomarker test described in subsection 1, the insurer shall
respond to a request for such prior authorization:
(a) Within 24 hours after receiving an urgent request; or
(b) Within 72 hours after receiving any other request.
4. The provisions of this section do not require an insurer to
provide coverage of biomarker testing:
(a) For screening purposes;
(b) Conducted by a provider of health care for whom the
biomarker testing is not within his or her scope of practice, training
and experience; or
-
*AB382*

– 3 –
(c) Conducted by a provider of health care or a facility that does
not participate in the network plan of the insurer . [; or
(d) That has not been determined to be medically necessary by a
provider of health care for whom such a determination is within his
or her scope of practice, training and experience.]
5. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
[October] January 1, [2023,] 2026, has the legal effect of including
the coverage required by this section, and any provision of the
policy or renewal which is in conflict with the provisions of this
section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively
measured and evaluated as an indicator of a normal biological
process, a pathogenic process or a pharmacological response to a
specific therapeutic intervention and includes, without limitation:
(1) An interaction between a gene and a drug that is being
used by or considered for use by the patient;
(2) A mutation or characteristic of a gene; and
(3) The expression of a protein.
(b) “Biomarker testing” means the analysis of the tissue, blood
or other biospecimen of a patient for the presentation of a biomarker
and includes, without limitation, single-analyte tests, multiplex
panel tests and whole genome, whole exome and whole
transcriptome sequencing.
(c) “Consensus statement” means a statement aimed at a specific
clinical circumstance that is:
(1) Made for the purpose of optimizing the outcomes of
clinical care;
(2) Made by an independent, multidisciplinary panel of
experts that has established a policy to avoid conflicts of interest;
(3) Based on scientific evidence; and
(4) Made using a transparent methodology and reporting
procedure.
(d) [“Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care; and
(3) Significant in guiding and informing the provider of
health care in providing the most appropriate course of treatment for
-
*AB382*

– 4 –
the patient in order to prevent, delay or lessen the magnitude of an
adverse health outcome.
(e)] “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” means
evidence-based guidelines establishing standards of care that
include, without limitation, recommendations intended to optimize
care of patients and are:
(1) Informed by a systemic review of evidence and an
assessment of the risks and benefits of alternative options for care;
and
(2) Developed using a transparent methodology and
reporting procedure by an independent organization or society of
medical professionals that has established a policy to avoid conflicts
of interest.
[(f)] (e) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical care,
are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
[(g)] (f) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 2. NRS 689B.0361 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689B.0361 1. Subject to the limitations prescribed by
subsection 4, an insurer that issues a policy of group health
insurance shall include in the policy coverage for [medically
necessary] biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment,
appropriate management and ongoing monitoring of [cancer] a
medical condition or disease when such biomarker testing is
supported by medical and scientific evidence. Such evidence
includes, without limitation:
(a) The labeled indications for a biomarker test or medication
that has been approved or cleared by the United States Food and
Drug Administration;
(b) The indicated tests for a drug that has been approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration or the warnings and
precautions included on the label of such a drug;
(c) A national coverage determination or local coverage
determination, as those terms are defined in 42 C.F.R. § 400.202; or
(d) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines or
consensus statements.
2. An insurer shall:
(a) Provide the coverage required by subsection 1 in a manner
that limits disruptions in care and the need for multiple specimens;
(b) Establish a clear and readily accessible process for an
insured or provider of health care to:
-
*AB382*

– 5 –
(1) Request an exception to a policy excluding coverage for
biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment, management or
ongoing monitoring of [cancer;] a medical condition or disease; or
(2) Appeal a denial of coverage for such biomarker testing;
and
(c) Make the process described in paragraph (b) available on an
Internet website maintained by the insurer.
3. If an insurer requires an insured to obtain prior authorization
for a biomarker test described in subsection 1, the insurer shall
respond to a request for such prior authorization:
(a) Within 24 hours after receiving an urgent request; or
(b) Within 72 hours after receiving any other request.
4. The provisions of this section do not require an insurer to
provide coverage of biomarker testing:
(a) For screening purposes;
(b) Conducted by a provider of health care for whom the
biomarker testing is not within his or her scope of practice, training
and experience; or
(c) Conducted by a provider of health care or a facility that does
not participate in the network plan of the insurer . [; or
(d) That has not been determined to be medically necessary by a
provider of health care for whom such a determination is within his
or her scope of practice, training and experience.]
5. A policy of group health insurance subject to the provisions
of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after [October] January 1, [2023,] 2026, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by this section, and any provision of
the policy or renewal which is in conflict with the provisions of this
section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively
measured and evaluated as an indicator of a normal biological
process, a pathogenic process or a pharmacological response to a
specific therapeutic intervention and includes, without limitation:
(1) An interaction between a gene and a drug that is being
used by or considered for use by the patient;
(2) A mutation or characteristic of a gene; and
(3) The expression of a protein.
(b) “Biomarker testing” means the analysis of the tissue, blood
or other biospecimen of a patient for the presentation of a biomarker
and includes, without limitation, single-analyte tests, multiplex
panel tests and whole genome, whole exome and whole
transcriptome sequencing.
(c) “Consensus statement” means a statement aimed at a specific
clinical circumstance that is:
-
*AB382*

– 6 –
(1) Made for the purpose of optimizing the outcomes of
clinical care;
(2) Made by an independent, multidisciplinary panel of
experts that has established a policy to avoid conflicts of interest;
(3) Based on scientific evidence; and
(4) Made using a transparent methodology and reporting
procedure.
(d) [“Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care; and
(3) Significant in guiding and informing the provider of
health care in providing the most appropriate course of treatment for
the patient in order to prevent, delay or lessen the magnitude of an
adverse health outcome.
(e)] “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” means
evidence-based guidelines establishing standards of care that
include, without limitation, recommendations intended to optimize
care of patients and are:
(1) Informed by a systemic review of evidence and an
assessment of the risks and benefits of alternative options for care;
and
(2) Developed using a transparent methodology and
reporting procedure by an independent organization or society of
medical professionals that has established a policy to avoid conflicts
of interest.
[(f)] (e) “Network plan” means a policy of group health
insurance offered by an insurer under which the financing and
delivery of medical care, including items and services paid for as
medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set
of providers under contract with the insurer. The term does not
include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
[(g)] (f) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 3. NRS 689C.1688 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689C.1688 1. Subject to the limitations prescribed by
subsection 4, a carrier that issues a health benefit plan shall include
in the plan coverage for [medically necessary] biomarker testing for
the diagnosis, treatment, appropriate management and ongoing
monitoring of [cancer] a medical condition or disease when such
-
*AB382*

– 7 –
biomarker testing is supported by medical and scientific evidence.
Such evidence includes, without limitation:
(a) The labeled indications for a biomarker test or medication
that has been approved or cleared by the United States Food and
Drug Administration;
(b) The indicated tests for a drug that has been approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration or the warnings and
precautions included on the label of such a drug;
(c) A national coverage determination or local coverage
determination, as those terms are defined in 42 C.F.R. § 400.202; or
(d) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines or
consensus statements.
2. A carrier shall:
(a) Provide the coverage required by subsection 1 in a manner
that limits disruptions in care and the need for multiple specimens;
(b) Establish a clear and readily accessible process for an
insured or provider of health care to:
(1) Request an exception to a policy excluding coverage for
biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment, management or
ongoing monitoring of [cancer;] a medical condition or disease; or
(2) Appeal a denial of coverage for such biomarker testing;
and
(c) Make the process described in paragraph (b) available on an
Internet website maintained by the carrier.
3. If a carrier requires an insured to obtain prior authorization
for a biomarker test described in subsection 1, the carrier shall
respond to a request for such prior authorization:
(a) Within 24 hours after receiving an urgent request; or
(b) Within 72 hours after receiving any other request.
4. The provisions of this section do not require a carrier to
provide coverage of biomarker testing:
(a) For screening purposes;
(b) Conducted by a provider of health care for whom the
biomarker testing is not within his or her scope of practice, training
and experience; or
(c) Conducted by a provider of health care or a facility that is
not in the applicable network plan of the carrier . [; or
(d) That has not been determined to be medically necessary by a
provider of health care for whom such a determination is within his
or her scope of practice, training and experience.]
5. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
[October] January 1, [2023,] 2026, has the legal effect of including
the coverage required by this section, and any provision of the plan
-
*AB382*

– 8 –
or renewal which is in conflict with the provisions of this section is
void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively
measured and evaluated as an indicator of a normal biological
process, a pathogenic process or a pharmacological response to a
specific therapeutic intervention and includes, without limitation:
(1) An interaction between a gene and a drug that is being
used by or considered for use by the patient;
(2) A mutation or characteristic of a gene; and
(3) The expression of a protein.
(b) “Biomarker testing” means the analysis of the tissue, blood
or other biospecimen of a patient for the presentation of a biomarker
and includes, without limitation, single-analyte tests, multiplex
panel tests and whole genome, whole exome and whole
transcriptome sequencing.
(c) “Consensus statement” means a statement aimed at a specific
clinical circumstance that is:
(1) Made for the purpose of optimizing the outcomes of
clinical care;
(2) Made by an independent, multidisciplinary panel of
experts that has established a policy to avoid conflicts of interest;
(3) Based on scientific evidence; and
(4) Made using a transparent methodology and reporting
procedure.
(d) [“Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care; and
(3) Significant in guiding and informing the provider of
health care in providing the most appropriate course of treatment for
the patient in order to prevent, delay or lessen the magnitude of an
adverse health outcome.
(e)] “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” means
evidence-based guidelines establishing standards of care that
include, without limitation, recommendations intended to optimize
care of patients and are:
(1) Informed by a systemic review of evidence and an
assessment of the risks and benefits of alternative options for care;
and
-
*AB382*

– 9 –
(2) Developed using a transparent methodology and
reporting procedure by an independent organization or society of
medical professionals that has established a policy to avoid conflicts
of interest.
[(f)] (e) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 4. NRS 695A.1859 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695A.1859 1. Subject to the limitations prescribed by
subsection 4, a society that issues a benefit contract shall include in
the contract coverage for [medically necessary] biomarker testing
for the diagnosis, treatment, appropriate management and ongoing
monitoring of [cancer] a medical condition or disease when such
biomarker testing is supported by medical and scientific evidence.
Such evidence includes, without limitation:
(a) The labeled indications for a biomarker test or medication
that has been approved or cleared by the United States Food and
Drug Administration;
(b) The indicated tests for a drug that has been approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration or the warnings and
precautions included on the label of such a drug;
(c) A national coverage determination or local coverage
determination, as those terms are defined in 42 C.F.R. § 400.202; or
(d) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines or
consensus statements.
2. A society shall:
(a) Provide the coverage required by subsection 1 in a manner
that limits disruptions in care and the need for multiple specimens;
(b) Establish a clear and readily accessible process for an
insured or provider of health care to:
(1) Request an exception to a policy excluding coverage for
biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment, management or
ongoing monitoring of [cancer;] a medical condition or disease; or
(2) Appeal a denial of coverage for such biomarker testing;
and
(c) Make the process described in paragraph (b) available on an
Internet website maintained by the society.
3. If a society requires an insured to obtain prior authorization
for a biomarker test described in subsection 1, the society shall
respond to a request for such prior authorization:
(a) Within 24 hours after receiving an urgent request; or
(b) Within 72 hours after receiving any other request.
4. The provisions of this section do not require a society to
provide coverage of biomarker testing:
(a) For screening purposes;
-
*AB382*

– 10 –
(b) Conducted by a provider of health care for whom the
biomarker testing is not within his or her scope of practice, training
and experience; or
(c) Conducted by a provider of health care or a facility that does
not participate in the network plan of the society . [; or
(d) That has not been determined to be medically necessary by a
provider of health care for whom such a determination is within his
or her scope of practice, training and experience.]
5. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
[October] January 1, [2023,] 2026, has the legal effect of including
the coverage required by this section, and any provision of the
benefit contract or renewal which is in conflict with the provisions
of this section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively
measured and evaluated as an indicator of a normal biological
process, a pathogenic process or a pharmacological response to a
specific therapeutic intervention and includes, without limitation:
(1) An interaction between a gene and a drug that is being
used by or considered for use by the patient;
(2) A gene mutation or characteristic; and
(3) The expression of a protein.
(b) “Biomarker testing” means the analysis of the tissue, blood
or other biospecimen of a patient for the presentation of a biomarker
and includes, without limitation, single-analyte tests, multiplex
panel tests and whole genome, whole exome and whole
transcriptome sequencing.
(c) “Consensus statement” means a statement aimed at a specific
clinical circumstance that is:
(1) Made for the purpose of optimizing the outcomes of
clinical care;
(2) Made by an independent, multidisciplinary panel of
experts that has established a policy to avoid conflicts of interest;
(3) Based on scientific evidence; and
(4) Made using a transparent methodology and reporting
procedure.
(d) [“Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care; and
-
*AB382*

– 11 –
(3) Significant in guiding and informing the provider of
health care in providing the most appropriate course of treatment for
the patient in order to prevent, delay or lessen the magnitude of an
adverse health outcome.
(e)] “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” means
evidence-based guidelines establishing standards of care that
include, without limitation, recommendations intended to optimize
care of patients and are:
(1) Informed by a systemic review of evidence and an
assessment of the risks and benefits of alternative options for care;
and
(2) Developed using a transparent methodology and
reporting procedure by an independent organization or society of
medical professionals that has established a policy to avoid conflicts
of interest.
[(f)] (e) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a
society under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are provided,
in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract
with the society. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
[(g)] (f) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 5. NRS 695B.19087 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.19087 1. Subject to the limitations prescribed by
subsection 4, a hospital or medical service corporation that issues a
policy of health insurance shall include in the policy coverage for
[medically necessary] biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment,
appropriate management and ongoing monitoring of [cancer] a
medical condition or disease when such biomarker testing is
supported by medical and scientific evidence. Such evidence
includes, without limitation:
(a) The labeled indications for a biomarker test or medication
that has been approved or cleared by the United States Food and
Drug Administration;
(b) The indicated tests for a drug that has been approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration or the warnings and
precautions included on the label of such a drug;
(c) A national coverage determination or local coverage
determination, as those terms are defined in 42 C.F.R. § 400.202; or
(d) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines or
consensus statements.
2. A hospital or medical service corporation shall:
-
*AB382*

– 12 –
(a) Provide the coverage required by subsection 1 in a manner
that limits disruptions in care and the need for multiple specimens;
(b) Establish a clear and readily accessible process for an
insured or provider of health care to:
(1) Request an exception to a policy excluding coverage for
biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment, management or
ongoing monitoring of [cancer;] a medical condition or disease; or
(2) Appeal a denial of coverage for such biomarker testing;
and
(c) Make the process described in paragraph (b) available on an
Internet website maintained by the hospital or medical service
corporation.
3. If a hospital or medical service corporation requires an
insured to obtain prior authorization for a biomarker test described
in subsection 1, the hospital or medical service corporation shall
respond to a request for such prior authorization:
(a) Within 24 hours after receiving an urgent request; or
(b) Within 72 hours after receiving any other request.
4. The provisions of this section do not require a hospital or
medical service corporation to provide coverage of biomarker
testing:
(a) For screening purposes;
(b) Conducted by a provider of health care for whom the
biomarker testing is not within his or her scope of practice, training
and experience; or
(c) Conducted by a provider of health care or a facility that does
not participate in the network plan of the hospital or medical service
corporation . [; or
(d) That has not been determined to be medically necessary by a
provider of health care for whom such a determination is within his
or her scope of practice, training and experience.]
5. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
[October] January 1, [2023,] 2026, has the legal effect of including
the coverage required by this section, and any provision of the
policy or renewal which is in conflict with the provisions of this
section is void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively
measured and evaluated as an indicator of a normal biological
process, a pathogenic process or a pharmacological response to a
specific therapeutic intervention and includes, without limitation:
(1) An interaction between a gene and a drug that is being
used by or considered for use by the patient;
(2) A mutation or characteristic of a gene; and
-
*AB382*

– 13 –
(3) The expression of a protein.
(b) “Biomarker testing” means the analysis of the tissue, blood
or other biospecimen of a patient for the presentation of a biomarker
and includes, without limitation, single-analyte tests, multiplex
panel tests and whole genome, whole exome and whole
transcriptome sequencing.
(c) “Consensus statement” means a statement aimed at a specific
clinical circumstance that is:
(1) Made for the purpose of optimizing the outcomes of
clinical care;
(2) Made by an independent, multidisciplinary panel of
experts that has established a policy to avoid conflicts of interest;
(3) Based on scientific evidence; and
(4) Made using a transparent methodology and reporting
procedure.
(d) [“Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care; and
(3) Significant in guiding and informing the provider of
health care in providing the most appropriate course of treatment for
the patient in order to prevent, delay or lessen the magnitude of an
adverse health outcome.
(e)] “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” means
evidence-based guidelines establishing standards of care that
include, without limitation, recommendations intended to optimize
care of patients and are:
(1) Informed by a systemic review of evidence and an
assessment of the risks and benefits of alternative options for care;
and
(2) Developed using a transparent methodology and
reporting procedure by an independent organization or society of
medical professionals that has established a policy to avoid conflicts
of interest.
[(f)] (e) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance
offered by a hospital or medical service corporation under which the
financing and delivery of medical care, including items and services
paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a
defined set of providers under contract with the hospital or medical
service corporation. The term does not include an arrangement for
the financing of premiums.
-
*AB382*

– 14 –
[(g)] (f) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 6. NRS 695C.16932 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.16932 1. Subject to the limitations prescribed by
subsection 4, a health maintenance organization that issues a health
care plan shall include in the plan coverage for [medically
necessary] biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment,
appropriate management and ongoing monitoring of [cancer] a
medical condition or disease when such biomarker testing is
supported by medical and scientific evidence. Such evidence
includes, without limitation:
(a) The labeled indications for a biomarker test or medication
that has been approved or cleared by the United States Food and
Drug Administration;
(b) The indicated tests for a drug that has been approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration or the warnings and
precautions included on the label of such a drug;
(c) A national coverage determination or local coverage
determination, as those terms are defined in 42 C.F.R. § 400.202; or
(d) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines or
consensus statements.
2. A health maintenance organization shall:
(a) Provide the coverage required by subsection 1 in a manner
that limits disruptions in care and the need for multiple specimens;
(b) Establish a clear and readily accessible process for an
enrollee or provider of health care to:
(1) Request an exception to a policy excluding coverage for
biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment, management or
ongoing monitoring of [cancer;] a medical condition or disease; or
(2) Appeal a denial of coverage for such biomarker testing;
and
(c) Make the process described in paragraph (b) available on an
Internet website maintained by the health maintenance organization.
3. If a health maintenance organization requires an enrollee to
obtain prior authorization for a biomarker test described in
subsection 1, the health maintenance organization shall respond to a
request for such prior authorization:
(a) Within 24 hours after receiving an urgent request; or
(b) Within 72 hours after receiving any other request.
4. The provisions of this section do not require a health
maintenance organization to provide coverage of biomarker testing:
(a) For screening purposes;
-
*AB382*

– 15 –
(b) Conducted by a provider of health care for whom the
biomarker testing is not within his or her scope of practice, training
and experience; or
(c) Conducted by a provider of health care or a facility that does
not participate in the network plan of the health maintenance
organization . [; or
(d) That has not been determined to be medically necessary by a
provider of health care for whom such a determination is within his
or her scope of practice, training and experience.]
5. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
[October] January 1, [2023,] 2026, has the legal effect of including
the coverage required by this section, and any provision of the plan
or renewal which is in conflict with the provisions of this section is
void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively
measured and evaluated as an indicator of a normal biological
process, a pathogenic process or a pharmacological response to a
specific therapeutic intervention and includes, without limitation:
(1) An interaction between a gene and a drug that is being
used by or considered for use by the patient;
(2) A mutation or characteristic of a gene; and
(3) The expression of a protein.
(b) “Biomarker testing” means the analysis of the tissue, blood
or other biospecimen of a patient for the presentation of a biomarker
and includes, without limitation, single-analyte tests, multiplex
panel tests and whole genome, whole exome and whole
transcriptome sequencing.
(c) “Consensus statement” means a statement aimed at a specific
clinical circumstance that is:
(1) Made for the purpose of optimizing the outcomes of
clinical care;
(2) Made by an independent, multidisciplinary panel of
experts that has established a policy to avoid conflicts of interest;
(3) Based on scientific evidence; and
(4) Made using a transparent methodology and reporting
procedure.
(d) [“Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
-
*AB382*

– 16 –
(2) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care; and
(3) Significant in guiding and informing the provider of
health care in providing the most appropriate course of treatment for
the patient in order to prevent, delay or lessen the magnitude of an
adverse health outcome.
(e)] “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” means
evidence-based guidelines establishing standards of care that
include, without limitation, recommendations intended to optimize
care of patients and are:
(1) Informed by a systemic review of evidence and an
assessment of the risks and benefits of alternative options for care;
and
(2) Developed using a transparent methodology and
reporting procedure by an independent organization or society of
medical professionals that has established a policy to avoid conflicts
of interest.
[(f)] (e) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
health maintenance organization under which the financing and
delivery of medical care, including items and services paid for as
medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set
of providers under contract with the health maintenance
organization. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
[(g)] (f) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 7. NRS 695G.1703 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695G.1703 1. Subject to the limitations prescribed by
subsection 4, a managed care organization that issues a health care
plan shall include in the plan coverage for [medically necessary]
biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment, appropriate
management and ongoing monitoring of [cancer] a medical
condition or disease when such biomarker testing is supported by
medical and scientific evidence. Such evidence includes, without
limitation:
(a) The labeled indications for a biomarker test or medication
that has been approved or cleared by the United States Food and
Drug Administration;
(b) The indicated tests for a drug that has been approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration or the warnings and
precautions included on the label of such a drug;
(c) A national coverage determination or local coverage
determination, as those terms are defined in 42 C.F.R. § 400.202; or
(d) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines or
consensus statements.
-
*AB382*

– 17 –
2. A managed care organization shall:
(a) Provide the coverage required by subsection 1 in a manner
that limits disruptions in care and the need for multiple specimens;
(b) Establish a clear and readily accessible process for an
insured or provider of health care to:
(1) Request an exception to a policy excluding coverage for
biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment, management or
ongoing monitoring of [cancer;] a medical condition or disease; or
(2) Appeal a denial of coverage for such biomarker testing;
and
(c) Make the process described in paragraph (b) available on an
Internet website maintained by the managed care organization.
3. If a managed care organization requires an insured to obtain
prior authorization for a biomarker test described in subsection 1,
the managed care organization shall respond to a request for such
prior authorization:
(a) Within 24 hours after receiving an urgent request; or
(b) Within 72 hours after receiving any other request.
4. The provisions of this section do not require a managed care
organization to provide coverage of biomarker testing:
(a) For screening purposes;
(b) Conducted by a provider of health care for whom the
biomarker testing is not within his or her scope of practice, training
and experience; or
(c) Conducted by a provider of health care or a facility that does
not participate in the network plan of the managed care organization
. [; or
(d) That has not been determined to be medically necessary by a
provider of health care for whom such a determination is within his
or her scope of practice, training and experience.]
5. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
[October] January 1, [2023,] 2026, has the legal effect of including
the coverage required by this section, and any provision of the plan
or renewal which is in conflict with the provisions of this section is
void.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively
measured and evaluated as an indicator of a normal biological
process, a pathogenic process or a pharmacological response to a
specific therapeutic intervention and includes, without limitation:
(1) An interaction between a gene and a drug that is being
used by or considered for use by the patient;
(2) A mutation or characteristic of a gene; and
(3) The expression of a protein.
-
*AB382*

– 18 –
(b) “Biomarker testing” means the analysis of the tissue, blood
or other biospecimen of a patient for the presentation of a biomarker
and includes, without limitation, single-analyte tests, multiplex
panel tests and whole genome, whole exome and whole
transcriptome sequencing.
(c) “Consensus statement” means a statement aimed at a specific
clinical circumstance that is:
(1) Made for the purpose of optimizing the outcomes of
clinical care;
(2) Made by an independent, multidisciplinary panel of
experts that has established a policy to avoid conflicts of interest;
(3) Based on scientific evidence; and
(4) Made using a transparent methodology and reporting
procedure.
(d) [“Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care; and
(3) Significant in guiding and informing the provider of
health care in providing the most appropriate course of treatment for
the patient in order to prevent, delay or lessen the magnitude of an
adverse health outcome.
(e)] “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” means
evidence-based guidelines establishing standards of care that
include, without limitation, recommendations intended to optimize
care of patients and are:
(1) Informed by a systemic review of evidence and an
assessment of the risks and benefits of alternative options for care;
and
(2) Developed using a transparent methodology and
reporting procedure by an independent organization or society of
medical professionals that has established a policy to avoid conflicts
of interest.
[(f)] (e) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the managed care organization. The
term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
-
*AB382*

– 19 –
[(g)] (f) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 8. NRS 422.272364 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
422.272364 1. Subject to the limitations prescribed by
subsection 4, the Director shall include in the State Plan for
Medicaid a requirement that the State pay the nonfederal share of
expenditures incurred for [medically necessary] biomarker testing
for the diagnosis, treatment, appropriate management and ongoing
monitoring of [cancer] a medical condition or disease when such
biomarker testing is supported by medical and scientific evidence.
Such evidence includes, without limitation:
(a) The labeled indications for a biomarker test or medication
that has been approved or cleared by the United States Food and
Drug Administration;
(b) The indicated tests for a drug that has been approved by the
United States Food and Drug Administration or the warnings and
precautions included on the label of such a drug;
(c) A national coverage determination or local coverage
determination, as those terms are defined in 42 C.F.R. § 400.202; or
(d) Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines or
consensus statements.
2. The Director shall:
(a) Ensure that the coverage required by subsection 1 is
provided in a manner that limits disruptions in care and the need for
multiple specimens;
(b) Include in the State Plan for Medicaid a clear and readily
accessible process for a recipient of Medicaid or provider of health
care to:
(1) Request an exception to a policy excluding coverage for
biomarker testing for the diagnosis, treatment, management or
ongoing monitoring of [cancer;] a medical condition or disease; or
(2) Appeal a denial of coverage for such biomarker testing;
and
(c) Make the process described in paragraph (b) available on an
Internet website maintained by the Department.
3. If the State Plan for Medicaid requires a recipient of
Medicaid to obtain prior authorization for a biomarker test described
in subsection 1, the State Plan must require a response to a request
for such prior authorization:
(a) Within 24 hours after receiving an urgent request; or
(b) Within 72 hours after receiving any other request.
4. The provisions of this section do not require the State Plan
for Medicaid to include coverage of biomarker testing:
(a) For screening purposes; or
-
*AB382*

– 20 –
(b) Conducted by a provider of health care for whom the
biomarker testing is not within his or her scope of practice, training
and experience . [; or
(c) That has not been determined to be medically necessary by a
provider of health care for whom such a determination is within his
or her scope of practice, training and experience.]
5. As used in this section:
(a) “Biomarker” means a characteristic that is objectively
measured and evaluated as an indicator of a normal biological
process, a pathogenic process or a pharmacological response to a
specific therapeutic intervention and includes, without limitation:
(1) An interaction between a gene and a drug that is being
used by or considered for use by the patient;
(2) A mutation or characteristic of a gene; and
(3) The expression of a protein.
(b) “Biomarker testing” means the analysis of the tissue, blood
or other biospecimen of a patient for the presentation of a biomarker
and includes, without limitation, single-analyte tests, multiplex
panel tests and whole genome, whole exome and whole
transcriptome sequencing.
(c) “Consensus statement” means a statement aimed at a specific
clinical circumstance that is:
(1) Made for the purpose of optimizing the outcomes of
clinical care;
(2) Made by an independent, multidisciplinary panel of
experts that has established a policy to avoid conflicts of interest;
(3) Based on scientific evidence; and
(4) Made using a transparent methodology and reporting
procedure.
(d) [“Medically necessary” means health care services or
products that a prudent provider of health care would provide to a
patient to prevent, diagnose or treat an illness, injury or disease, or
any symptoms thereof, that are necessary and:
(1) Provided in accordance with generally accepted standards
of medical practice;
(2) Not primarily provided for the convenience of the patient
or provider of health care; and
(3) Significant in guiding and informing the provider of
health care in providing the most appropriate course of treatment for
the patient in order to prevent, delay or lessen the magnitude of an
adverse health outcome.
(e)] “Nationally recognized clinical practice guidelines” means
evidence-based guidelines establishing standards of care that
include, without limitation, recommendations intended to optimize
care of patients and are:
-
*AB382*

– 21 –
(1) Informed by a systemic review of evidence and an
assessment of the risks and benefits of alternative options for care;
and
(2) Developed using a transparent methodology and
reporting procedure by an independent organization or society of
medical professionals that has established a policy to avoid conflicts
of interest.
[(f)] (e) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 9. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 10. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 9, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB382*